Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-237
Property; sale at auction; regulation.

A city of the first class by ordinance may regulate, license, or prohibit the sale of domestic animals or of goods, wares, and merchandise at public auction on the streets, alleys, highways, or any public grounds within the city; and regulate or license the auctioneering of goods, wares, domestic animals, and merchandise. If the applicant is an individual, an application for a license shall include the applicant's social security number.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XLIII, p. 257;

R.S.1913, § 4853;

C.S.1922, § 4021;

C.S.1929, § 16-238;

R.S.1943, § 16-237;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 75.

The right to enact ordinances regulating auction sales within the corporate limits is conferred by this section, but ordinance enacted cannot place arbitrary and unreasonable restrictions on the conduct of lawful business. Webber v. City of Scottsbluff, 141 Neb. 363, 3 N.W.2d 635 (1942).